test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NAD_C_mishoomis_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NAD - C - mishoomis :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     mishoomis: mishoomis
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+mishoomis: nimishoomis
     2+mishoomis: gimishoomis
     3+mishoomis: omishoomis
     X+mishoomis: imishoomis
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mishoomis+NA+Con: mishoomisenh
     mishoomis+NA+Dim: mishoomisens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     mishoomis+NA+Pej: mishoomisish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     mishoomis+NA+Pret: mishoomisiban
     mishoomis+NA+VocPl: [mishoomisidig, mishoomisidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     mishoomis+NA+Loc: mishoomising
     mishoomis+NA+Obv: mishoomisan
     mishoomis+NA+Pl: mishoomisag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con: nimishoomisenh
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim: nimishoomisens
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con: gimishoomisenh
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim: gimishoomisens
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con: omishoomisenh
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim: omishoomisens
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con: imishoomisenh
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim: imishoomisens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos: nimishoomisim
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos: gimishoomisim
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos: omishoomisim
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos: imishoomisim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej: nimishoomisish
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej: gimishoomisish
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej: omishoomisish
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pej: imishoomisish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+mishoomis+NA+1Pl: nimishoomisinaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+21: gimishoomisinaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+2Pl: gimishoomisiwaa
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Obv: omishoomisini
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Pl: omishoomisiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pret: nimishoomisiban
     1+mishoomis+NA+VocPl: [nimishoomisidig, nimishoomisidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pret: gimishoomisiban
     2+mishoomis+NA+VocPl: [gimishoomisidig, gimishoomisidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pret: omishoomisiban
     3+mishoomis+NA+VocPl: [omishoomisidig, omishoomisidog]
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pret: imishoomisiban
     X+mishoomis+NA+VocPl: [imishoomisidig, imishoomisidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Loc: nimishoomising
     1+mishoomis+NA+Obv: nimishoomisan
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pl: nimishoomisag
     2+mishoomis+NA+Loc: gimishoomising
     2+mishoomis+NA+Obv: gimishoomisan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pl: gimishoomisag
     3+mishoomis+NA+Loc: omishoomising
     3+mishoomis+NA+Obv: omishoomisan
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pl: omishoomisag
     X+mishoomis+NA+Loc: imishoomising
     X+mishoomis+NA+Obv: imishoomisan
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pl: imishoomisag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej: mishoomisenyish
     mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej: mishoomisensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret: mishoomisenyiban
     mishoomis+NA+Con+VocPl: [mishoomisenyidig, mishoomisenyidog]
     mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret: mishoomisensiban
     mishoomis+NA+Dim+VocPl: [mishoomisensidig, mishoomisensidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     mishoomis+NA+Con+Loc: mishoomisenying
     mishoomis+NA+Con+Obv: mishoomisenyin
     mishoomis+NA+Con+Pl: mishoomisenyig
     mishoomis+NA+Dim+Loc: mishoomisensing
     mishoomis+NA+Dim+Obv: mishoomisensan
     mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pl: mishoomisensag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret: mishoomisishiban
     mishoomis+NA+Pej+VocPl: [mishoomisishidig, mishoomisishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     mishoomis+NA+Pej+Loc: mishoomisishing
     mishoomis+NA+Pej+Obv: mishoomisishan
     mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pl: mishoomisishag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     mishoomis+NA+Pret+Loc: mishoomisibaniing
     mishoomis+NA+Pret+Obv: mishoomisibaniin
     mishoomis+NA+Pret+Pl: mishoomisibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos: nimishoomisenyim
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos: nimishoomisensim
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos: gimishoomisenyim
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos: gimishoomisensim
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos: omishoomisenyim
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos: omishoomisensim
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pos: imishoomisenyim
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pos: imishoomisensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej: nimishoomisenyish
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej: nimishoomisensish
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej: gimishoomisenyish
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej: gimishoomisensish
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej: omishoomisenyish
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej: omishoomisensish
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pej: imishoomisenyish
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pej: imishoomisensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+1Pl: nimishoomisenyinaan
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+1Pl: nimishoomisensinaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+21: gimishoomisenyinaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+2Pl: gimishoomisenyiwaa
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+21: gimishoomisensinaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+2Pl: gimishoomisensiwaa
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Obv: omishoomisenyini
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+3Pl: omishoomisenyiwaa
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Obv: omishoomisensini
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+3Pl: omishoomisensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret: nimishoomisenyiban
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+VocPl: [nimishoomisenyidig, nimishoomisenyidog]
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret: nimishoomisensiban
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+VocPl: [nimishoomisensidig, nimishoomisensidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret: gimishoomisenyiban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+VocPl: [gimishoomisenyidig, gimishoomisenyidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret: gimishoomisensiban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+VocPl: [gimishoomisensidig, gimishoomisensidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret: omishoomisenyiban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+VocPl: [omishoomisenyidig, omishoomisenyidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret: omishoomisensiban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+VocPl: [omishoomisensidig, omishoomisensidog]
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pret: imishoomisenyiban
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con+VocPl: [imishoomisenyidig, imishoomisenyidog]
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pret: imishoomisensiban
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim+VocPl: [imishoomisensidig, imishoomisensidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Loc: nimishoomisenying
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Obv: nimishoomisenyin
     1+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pl: nimishoomisenyig
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Loc: nimishoomisensing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Obv: nimishoomisensan
     1+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pl: nimishoomisensag
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Loc: gimishoomisenying
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Obv: gimishoomisenyin
     2+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pl: gimishoomisenyig
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Loc: gimishoomisensing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Obv: gimishoomisensan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pl: gimishoomisensag
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Loc: omishoomisenying
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Obv: omishoomisenyin
     3+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pl: omishoomisenyig
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Loc: omishoomisensing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Obv: omishoomisensan
     3+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pl: omishoomisensag
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con+Loc: imishoomisenying
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con+Obv: imishoomisenyin
     X+mishoomis+NA+Con+Pl: imishoomisenyig
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Loc: imishoomisensing
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Obv: imishoomisensan
     X+mishoomis+NA+Dim+Pl: imishoomisensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej: nimishoomisimish
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej: gimishoomisimish
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej: omishoomisimish
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pej: imishoomisimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+1Pl: nimishoomisiminaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+21: gimishoomisiminaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+2Pl: gimishoomisimiwaa
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Obv: omishoomisimini
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+3Pl: omishoomisimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret: nimishoomisimiban
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+VocPl: [nimishoomisimidig, nimishoomisimidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret: gimishoomisimiban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+VocPl: [gimishoomisimidig, gimishoomisimidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret: omishoomisimiban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+VocPl: [omishoomisimidig, omishoomisimidog]
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pret: imishoomisimiban
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+VocPl: [imishoomisimidig, imishoomisimidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Loc: nimishoomisiming
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Obv: nimishoomisiman
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pl: nimishoomisimag
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Loc: gimishoomisiming
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Obv: gimishoomisiman
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pl: gimishoomisimag
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Loc: omishoomisiming
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Obv: omishoomisiman
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pl: omishoomisimag
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Loc: imishoomisiming
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Obv: imishoomisiman
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pos+Pl: imishoomisimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+1Pl: nimishoomisishinaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+21: gimishoomisishinaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+2Pl: gimishoomisishiwaa
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Obv: omishoomisishini
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+3Pl: omishoomisishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret: nimishoomisishiban
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+VocPl: [nimishoomisishidig, nimishoomisishidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret: gimishoomisishiban
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+VocPl: [gimishoomisishidig, gimishoomisishidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret: omishoomisishiban
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+VocPl: [omishoomisishidig, omishoomisishidog]
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pret: imishoomisishiban
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pej+VocPl: [imishoomisishidig, imishoomisishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Loc: nimishoomisishing
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Obv: nimishoomisishan
     1+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pl: nimishoomisishag
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Loc: gimishoomisishing
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Obv: gimishoomisishan
     2+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pl: gimishoomisishag
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Loc: omishoomisishing
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Obv: omishoomisishan
     3+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pl: omishoomisishag
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Loc: imishoomisishing
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Obv: imishoomisishan
     X+mishoomis+NA+Pej+Pl: imishoomisishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+mishoomis+NA+1Pl+Pret: nimishoomisinaaniban
     1+mishoomis+NA+1Pl+VocPl: [nimishoomisinaanidig, nimishoomisinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+21+Pret: gimishoomisinaaniban
     2+mishoomis+NA+21+VocPl: [gimishoomisinaanidig, gimishoomisinaanidog]
     2+mishoomis+NA+2Pl+Pret: gimishoomisiwaaban
     2+mishoomis+NA+2Pl+VocPl: [gimishoomisiwaadig, gimishoomisiwaadog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Obv+Pret: omishoomisiniiban
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Obv+VocPl: [omishoomisiniidig, omishoomisiniidog]
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Pl+Pret: omishoomisiwaaban
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Pl+VocPl: [omishoomisiwaadig, omishoomisiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+mishoomis+NA+1Pl+Loc: nimishoomisinaaning
     1+mishoomis+NA+1Pl+Obv: nimishoomisinaanin
     1+mishoomis+NA+1Pl+Pl: nimishoomisinaanig
     2+mishoomis+NA+21+Loc: gimishoomisinaaning
     2+mishoomis+NA+21+Obv: gimishoomisinaanin
     2+mishoomis+NA+21+Pl: gimishoomisinaanig
     2+mishoomis+NA+2Pl+Loc: gimishoomisiwaang
     2+mishoomis+NA+2Pl+Obv: gimishoomisiwaan
     2+mishoomis+NA+2Pl+Pl: gimishoomisiwaag
     3+mishoomis+NA+3Obv+Loc: omishoomisiniing
